Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB216.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1401 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 1401. Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Representation" means a communication that is used to identify goods or services for which reimbursement is sought under the medical assistance program or that is or may be used to determine a rate of reimbursement under the medical assistance program.12345678910111213141516171819 * * *Section 2. Section 1407 of the act is amended to read:Section 1407. [Provider] Prohibited Acts, Criminal Penalties and Civil Remedies.--(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to:(1) [Knowingly or intentionally present for allowance or payment any false or fraudulent claim or cost report for furnishing services or merchandise under medical assistance, or to knowingly present for allowance or payment any claim or cost report for medically unnecessary services or merchandise under medical assistance, or to knowingly submit false information, for the purpose of obtaining greater compensation than that to which he is legally entitled for furnishing services or merchandise under medical assistance, or to knowingly submit false information for the purpose of obtaining authorization for furnishing services or merchandise under medical assistance.] Make or cause to be made a materially false, fraudulent or misleading statement, claim or representation in a document or record in any format, including written or electronic, used by any person in connection with providing goods or services to any recipient under the medical assistance program.(1.1) Submit or cause to be submitted false information for the purpose of obtaining greater compensation than that to which the person is legally entitled for furnishing goods or services under the medical assistance program.(1.2) Submit or cause to be submitted a claim for medically unnecessary or inadequate services or merchandise provided to a recipient under the medical assistance program.(2) Solicit or receive or to offer or pay any remuneration, including any kickback, bribe or rebate, directly or indirectly, 20250HB0216PN0173 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in cash or in kind from or to any person in connection with the furnishing of services or merchandise for which payment may be in whole or in part under the medical assistance program or in connection with referring an individual to a person for the furnishing or arranging for the furnishing of any services or merchandise for which payment may be made in whole or in part under the medical assistance program.(3) Submit or cause to be submitted a duplicate claim for services, supplies or equipment for which [the provider] a person has already received or claimed reimbursement from any source.(4) Submit or cause to be submitted a claim for services, supplies or equipment which were not rendered to a recipient.(5) Submit or cause to be submitted a claim for services, supplies or equipment which includes costs or charges not related to such services, supplies or equipment rendered to the recipient.(6) Submit or cause to be submitted a claim or refer a recipient to another provider by referral, order or prescription, for services, supplies or equipment which:(i) are not documented in the record in the prescribed manner and are of little or no benefit to the recipient[,];(ii) are below the accepted medical treatment standards[, or]; or(iii) are unneeded by the recipient.(7) Submit or cause to be submitted a claim which misrepresents the description of services, supplies or equipment dispensed or provided; the dates of services; the identity of the recipient; the identity of the attending, prescribing or referring practitioner; or the identity of the actual 20250HB0216PN0173 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [provider.] person dispensing or providing services, supplies or equipment . (8) Submit or cause to be submitted a claim for reimbursement for a service, charge or item at a fee or charge which is higher than the [provider's] person's usual and customary charge to the general public for the same service or item.(9) Submit or cause to be submitted a claim for a service or item which was not rendered by the [provider] person.(10) Dispense, render or provide a service or item without a practitioner's written order and the consent of the recipient, except in emergency situations, or submit a claim for a service or item which was dispensed, or provided without the consent of the recipient, except in emergency situations.(11) Except in emergency situations, dispense, render or provide a service or item to a patient claiming to be a recipient without making a reasonable effort to ascertain by verification through a current medical assistance identification card, that the person or patient is, in fact, a recipient who is eligible on the date of service and without another available medical resource.(12) Enter into an agreement, combination or conspiracy to obtain or aid another to obtain reimbursement or payments for which there is not entitlement.(13) Make a false statement in the application for enrollment as a provider.(14) Commit any of the prohibited acts described in section 1403(d)(1), (2), (4) and (5).(15) Submit or cause to be submitted a claim or any document or record in any format, including written or electronic, for 20250HB0216PN0173 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the purposes of obtaining reimbursement from the medical assistance program during any time period when the person is excluded or precluded from participation in the medical assistance program or when the person is on the Federal List of Excluded Individuals/Entities.(b) (1) [A person who violates any provision of subsection (a), excepting subsection (a)(11), is guilty of a felony of the third degree for each such violation with a maximum penalty of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) and seven years imprisonment. A violation of subsection (a) shall be deemed to continue so long as the course of conduct or the defendant's complicity therein continues; the offense is committed when the course of conduct or complicity of the defendant therein is terminated in accordance with the provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. § 5552(d) (relating to other offenses). Whenever any person has been previously convicted in any state or Federal court of conduct that would constitute a violation of subsection (a), a subsequent allegation, indictment or information under subsection (a) shall be classified as a felony of the second degree with a maximum penalty of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and ten years imprisonment.(2)] A person who knowingly or intentionally violates subsection (a), excluding the provisions of subsection (a)(15), commits:(i) A felony of the second degree if the amount of excess payments, whether claimed or actually paid, is more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or if the person has a prior conviction in any Federal or state court for conduct that would constitute a violation of subsection (a).(ii) A felony of the third degree if the amount of excess 20250HB0216PN0173 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 payments, whether claimed or actually paid, is more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) but less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).(iii) A misdemeanor of the first degree if the amount of excess payments, whether claimed or actually paid, is less than two thousand dollars ($2,000).(2) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates subsection (a)(15) commits a felony of the second degree.(b.1) (1) In addition to the penalties provided under subsection (b), the trial court shall order any person convicted under subsection (a):(i) to repay the amount of the excess benefits or payments plus interest on that amount at the maximum legal rate from the date payment was made by the Commonwealth to the date repayment is made to the Commonwealth;(ii) to pay an amount not to exceed threefold the amount of excess benefits or payments.(2) (Reserved).(3) Any person convicted under subsection (a) shall be ineligible to participate in the medical assistance program for a period of five years from the date of conviction. The department shall notify any [provider so convicted that the provider agreement is terminated for five years, and the provider] person so convicted of the termination of any provider agreement and of the five-year period of ineligibility to participate in the medical assistance program. The person is entitled to a hearing on the sole issue of identity. If the conviction is set aside on appeal, the termination shall be lifted.(4) The Attorney General and the district attorneys of the 20250HB0216PN0173 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 several counties shall have concurrent authority to institute criminal proceedings under the provisions of this section.(5) As used in this section the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:"Conviction" means a verdict of guilty, a guilty plea, or a plea of nolo contendere in the trial court."Medically unnecessary or inadequate services or merchandise" means services or merchandise which are unnecessary or inadequate as determined by medical professionals engaged by the department who are competent in the same or similar field within the practice of medicine.(b.2) A violation of subsection (a) shall be deemed to continue so long as the course of conduct or the person's complicity in the course of conduct continues. An offense is committed when the course of conduct or complicity of the person in the course of conduct is terminated as provided under 42 Pa.C.S. § 5552(d) (relating to other offenses).(c) (1) If the department determines that a [provider] person providing or dispensing services, supplies or equipment has committed any prohibited act or has failed to satisfy any requirement under [section 1407(a)] subsection (a), it shall have the authority to immediately terminate, upon notice to the [provider, the] person, any provider agreement and to institute a civil suit against such [provider] person in the court of common pleas for twice the amount of excess benefits or payments plus legal interest from the date the violation or violations occurred. The department shall have the authority to use statistical sampling methods to determine the appropriate amount of restitution due from the [provider] person.(2) [Providers who are] A person who is terminated from 20250HB0216PN0173 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 participation in the medical assistance program for any reason shall be prohibited from owning, arranging for, rendering or ordering any service for medical assistance recipients during the period of [termination] ineligibility to participate in the medical assistance program. In addition, such [provider] person may not receive, during the period of [termination] ineligibility to participate in the medical assistance program, reimbursement in the form of direct payments from the department or indirect payments of medical assistance funds in the form of salary, shared fees, contracts, kickbacks or rebates from or through any participating provider.(3) [Notice of any action taken by the department against a provider pursuant to clauses (1) and (2) will be forwarded by the department to the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit of the Department of Justice and to the appropriate licensing board of the Department of State for appropriate action, if any. In addition, the department will forward to the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit of the Department of Justice and the appropriate Pennsylvania licensing board of the Department of State any cases of suspected provider fraud.] The department shall forward notice of any action taken by the department against a person under this section to the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit of the Office of Attorney General and to the appropriate licensing board of the Department of State for appropriate action. The department shall forward to the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit of the Office of Attorney General and the appropriate licensing board of the Department of State any cases of suspected fraud by a person except for reports required under section 1417.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0216PN0173 - 8 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829